Utah statutes.
19-1-203.   Representatives of department authorized to enter regulated premises.

(1)  Authorized representatives of the department, upon presentation of appropriate credentials, may enter at reasonable times upon the premises of properties regulated under this title to perform inspections to insure compliance with rules made by the department.

(2)  The inspection authority provided in this section does not apply to chapters in this title which provide for specific inspection procedures and authority.

